Washington statutes.
RCW 26.18.140

Hearing to quash, modify, or terminate wage assignment order or income withholding order—Grounds—Alternate payment plan.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in a hearing to quash, modify, or terminate the wage assignment order or income withholding order, the court may grant relief only upon a showing that the wage assignment order or income withholding order causes extreme hardship or substantial injustice. Satisfaction by the obligor of all past due payments subsequent to the issuance of the wage assignment order or income withholding order is not grounds to quash, modify, or terminate the wage assignment order or income withholding order. If a wage assignment order or income withholding order has been in operation for twelve consecutive months and the obligor's support or maintenance obligation is current, the court may terminate the order upon motion of the obligor unless the obligee can show good cause as to why the wage assignment order or income withholding order should remain in effect.

(2) The court may enter an order delaying, modifying, or terminating the wage assignment order or income withholding order and order the obligor to make payments directly to the obligee as provided in RCW 26.23.050(2).

[ 2021 c 35 s 11; 2008 c 6 s 1036; 1994 c 230 s 6; 1993 c 426 s 11; 1991 c 367 s 22; 1984 c 260 s 14.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Severability—Effective date—Captions not law—1991 c 367: See notes following RCW 26.09.015.